Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 41 State Self-Insurance Program

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 4, effective June 30, 1988, repealed this chapter.

Laws 1988, ch. 6, § 2, repealed Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 4.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 4, was also amended by Laws 1988, ch. 19, § 1, so as to repeal this chapter effective June 30, 1990. This provision was not given effect due to the repeal of Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 4 by Laws 1988, ch. 6, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

57 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal, County, School and State Tort Liability § 1 et seq.

81A C.J.S. States § 299.

§ 1-41-101.
Legislative findings and intent.

The legislature recognizes
that certain liability insurance policies of the state of Wyoming
have been cancelled, that no responsive bids have been received and
that there exists a need to develop a method to handle claims brought
under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act [§

1-39-101

et seq.] and arising under federal law. The legislature
declares that the appropriate remedy is to create an account for self-insurance
of the state and to provide for a loss prevention program. It is the
intent of the legislature that the self-insurance account shall be
operated on an actuarially sound basis. The legislature further declares
that its intent is that the availability of commercial liability insurance
coverage shall be explored considering the possibility that the insurance
industry can provide coverage in the future that is less expensive
than the costs of providing a loss prevention program and paying for
claims out of the self-insurance account.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1.

Applied

in

State Ex Rel. Arnold v. Ommen, 2009 WY 24, 201 P.3d 1127,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Feb. 24, 2009).

Quoted

in

W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 1-41-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Division” means the general services division of the department of administration and information;

“Final money judgment” means any judgment for monetary damages after all appropriate appeals from the judgment have been exhausted or after the time has expired when appeals may be taken;

“Local government” means as defined by W.S. 1-39-103(a)(ii);

“Peace officer” means as defined by W.S.

7-2-101

, but does not include those officers defined by W.S.

7-2-101

(a)(iv)(K) or those officers defined by W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(M) unless otherwise provided in the applicable mutual aid agreement;

“Public employee” means any officer, employee or servant of the state, provided the term:

Includes elected or appointed officials, peace officers, members of regional emergency response teams authorized under W.S.

35-9-155

and persons acting on behalf or in service of the state in any official capacity, whether with or without compensation, including volunteer physicians providing medical services under W.S. 9-2-103(a)(i)(C);

Does not include:

An independent contractor except as provided in subparagraphs (C) and (D) of this paragraph;

A judicial officer exercising the authority vested in him; or

Any local government employees or officials including county and prosecuting attorneys.

Includes contract physicians, physician assistants, nurses, optometrists or dentists in the course of providing contract services for state institutions;

Includes contract attorneys in the course of providing contract services for the office of guardian ad litem as provided in W.S.

14-12-104

;

Includes health care providers and medical facilities delivering volunteer health care services to low income individuals under a contract pursuant to W.S.

35-31-101

through

35-31-103

.

“Risk manager” means the manager of the risk management section of the general services division of the department of administration and information;

“Scope of duties” means performing any duties which the state requests, requires or authorizes a public employee to perform, or which the University of Wyoming or a local government requests, requires or authorizes a peace officer to perform, regardless of the time and place of performance;

“State” or “state agency” means the state of Wyoming or any of its branches, agencies, departments, boards, instrumentalities or institutions but does not include the University of Wyoming except as provided by W.S. 1-41-110(b);

“Self-insurance account” or “account” means the account created by W.S.

1-41-103

;

“This act” means W.S.

1-41-101

through

1-41-111

.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1; 1988, ch. 50, § 1; 1989, ch. 240, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1997, ch. 159, § 1; ch. 178, § 1; 1999, ch. 100, § 1; 2000, ch. 61, § 1; 2003, ch. 53, § 2; 2004, ch. 98, § 2; 2007, ch. 212, § 1, ch. 215, § 1; 2012, ch. 76, § 3; 2018 ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(V)(A), inserted “members of regional emergency response teams authorized under W.S.

35-9-155

” following “Includes elected or appointed officials, peace officers,” and made related changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 98, § 3 makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2004.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, inserted “physician assistants, nurses, optometrists or dentists” in (a)(v)(C).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 215, § 1, substituted “9-2-103(a)(i))(C)” for “9-2-103(a)(iii)” in (a)(v)(A).

While neither amendment gave affect to the other, both have been set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

in (a)(v)(B)(I), substituted “subparagraphs” for “subparagraph” and inserted “and (D)”; and added (a)(v)(D).

Laws 2012, ch. 76 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018,
added (a)(v)(E).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(v)(D) substituted “office of guardian ad litem” for “state public defenders office” and “W.S.

14-12-104

” for “W.S. 7-6-103(k) or

14-12-104

.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cross references. —

As to University of Wyoming, see §

21-17-101

et seq.

Applicability. —

Laws 2007, ch. 212, § 3, states: “This act shall apply to acts or omissions occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Quoted

in

W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 1-41-103.
Self-insurance account; creation; authorized payments.

There is created the state self-insurance account. The account shall be in such amount as the legislature determines to be reasonably sufficient to meet anticipated claims. In addition to any legislative appropriation, the account shall include all authorized transfers of monies to the account, all income from investments of monies in the account and payments by insurance or reinsurance companies. The account may be divided into subaccounts for purposes of administrative management. Appropriations to the account shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal period.

The self-insurance account shall maintain sufficient reserves for incurred but unpaid claims as well as incurred but unreported claims.

Expenditures shall be made out of the self-insurance account for the following claims which have been settled or reduced to final judgment:

Claims brought against the state or its public employees under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, provided any amount up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) paid for or in defense of each claim involving an automobile, physical damage, a settlement or adverse judgment shall be reimbursed to the self-insurance account by the state agency, from its existing budget, against which the claim is brought or which employs the public employee against whom the claim is brought;

Claims against the state or its public employees, or a state judicial officer exercising the authority vested in him, arising under 42 U.S.C. 1983 or other federal statutes, which the state has obligated itself to pay under subsection (e) of this section, provided any amount up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) paid for or in defense of each claim resulting in settlement or adverse judgment shall be reimbursed to the self-insurance account by the state agency, from its existing budget, against which the claim is brought or which employs the public employee against whom the claim is brought;

Claims against a peace officer employed, with or without compensation, by the Wyoming state board of outfitters and professional guides, the University of Wyoming or a local government brought under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, provided:

The act or omission upon which the claim is based has been determined by a court or jury to be within the peace officer’s scope of duties;

The indemnification for the judgment shall not exceed the limits provided by W.S.

1-39-118

;

Any amount up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) paid for or in defense of each claim shall be paid on a dollar for dollar matching basis from the account and from the University of Wyoming or the local government employing the peace officers;

Any amount up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) paid for or in defense of each claim against a peace officer employed by the Wyoming state board of outfitters and professional guides shall be paid by the board; and

“Peace officer” as used in this paragraph includes part time and reserve peace officers as defined in W.S. 9-1-701(a)(viii).

Claims against a peace officer employed, with or without compensation, by the Wyoming state board of outfitters and professional guides, the University of Wyoming or a local government arising under 42 U.S.C. 1983 or other federal statutes, provided:

Any amount up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) paid from the account for or in defense of each claim shall be paid on a dollar for dollar matching basis from the account and from the University of Wyoming or the local government employing the peace officer;

Any amount up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) paid for or in defense of each claim against a peace officer employed by the Wyoming state board of outfitters and professional guides shall be paid by the board;

The conditions and limitations of subsection (e) of this section apply to all claims under this paragraph; and

“Peace officer” as used in this paragraph includes part time and reserve peace officers as defined in W.S. 9-1-701(a)(viii).

Claims against contract physicians, physician assistants, nurses, optometrists or dentists brought under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act or federal law, provided:

The contract physician, physician assistant, nurse, optometrist or dentist is unable to procure medical malpractice insurance coverage up to the limits specified in W.S. 1-39-110(b) or

1-39-118

(a) as applicable;

The liability of the state shall not exceed limits specified in W.S. 1-39-118(a) except as the limitation may be increased by W.S. 1-39-110(b) both reduced by the amount of the contract physician’s, physician assistant’s, nurse’s, optometrist’s or dentist’s malpractice insurance coverage applicable to such claim; and

The claim arises from services performed by the contract physician, physician assistant, nurse, optometrist or dentist for a state institution.

Expenditures may also be made out of the self-insurance account for any one (1) or more of the following:

Expenses related to claims under subsection (c) of this section;

Costs of purchasing services, including loss prevention, risk and claims control, and legal, actuarial, investigative, support and adjustment services;

Costs of insurance or reinsurance premiums consistent with market availability;

Administrative expenses incurred by the division under this act including the cost of necessary personnel within the office of the attorney general, as may be mutually agreed upon by the risk manager and the attorney general, to handle claims arising under this act.

The state shall defend claims against its public employees, or a state judicial officer exercising the authority vested in him, arising under 42 U.S.C. 1983 or other federal statutes, subject to the following conditions:

The state shall defend and, to the extent provided by paragraph (v) of this subsection, indemnify any of its public employees against any claim or demand, whether groundless or otherwise, arising out of an alleged act or omission occurring in the scope of duty;

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 50, § 2.

If any civil action, suit or proceeding is brought against any public employee of the state which on its face falls within the provisions of paragraph (i) of this subsection, or which the public employee asserts to be based in fact upon an alleged act or omission in the scope of duty, the state shall appear and defend the public employee under an automatic reservation of right by the state to reject the claim unless the act or omission is determined to be within the scope of duty;

Any public employee of the state against whom a claim within the scope of this subsection is made shall cooperate fully with the state in the defense of the claim. If the state determines that the public employee has not cooperated or has otherwise acted to prejudice defense of the claim, the state may at any time reject the defense of the claim;

Unless the act or omission upon which a claim is based is determined by the court or jury to be within the public employee’s scope of duty, no public funds shall be expended in payment of the final judgment against the public employee;

Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to:

Increase the limits of liability under W.S.

1-39-118

for claims brought under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act;

Affect the liability of the state itself or of any of its public employees on any claim arising out of the same accident or occurrence; or

Waive the protection of the state or its public employees from liability where immunity has not been specifically waived.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1; 1988, ch. 6, § 1; ch. 50, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 14, § 1; ch. 240, § 1; 1994, ch. 47, § 1; 1999, ch. 100, § 1; 2005, ch; 2007, ch. 212, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; 2019 ch. 115, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in subsection (a), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund”; and in (c)(iii)(C) and (c)(iv)(A), substituted “account” for “fund.”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted variants of “physician assistants, nurses, optometrists or dentists” throughout (a).

The 2010 amendment,

made stylistic change.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2011 amendment,

in the introductory language of (d), added “any one (1) or more of the following”; and in (d)(ii), deleted “and” at the end.

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (c)(iii) and in (c)(iv), added “with or without compensation” following “employed,” added (c)(iii)(E) and (c)(iv)(D), and made related changes.

Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. —

See §§

1-39-101

, 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-41-102(a)(x).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2007, ch. 212, § 3, states: “This act shall apply to acts or omissions occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Federal § 1983 actions against county sheriff. —

This chapter is intended to cover federal § 1983 actions brought against all peace officers in their individual capacity, as defined at § 7-2-101(a)(iv), including county sheriffs. W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

A federal § 1983 claim against a county sheriff in his or her official capacity is not covered by this chapter because a § 1983 official capacity action against a sheriff is really a § 1983 claim against the county and therefore is not a claim “against a peace officer employed by … a local government arising under 42 USCS 1983,” as is required by subsection (c)(iv). W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 1-41-104.
Investment
of funds.

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 82, § 2.

The state treasurer shall invest any portion of the funds in the self-insurance account, including reserves, which the risk manager determines is not needed for immediate use. Investments shall be made as authorized by W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e).

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1; 1987, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 1; 1988, ch. 82, § 2; 1996, ch. 112, § 2; 2008, ch. 113, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)” for “W.S.

9-4-711

” in (b).

§ 1-41-105.
Powers and duties of risk manager.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the risk manager shall:

Administer the self-insurance account;

Implement and administer a loss prevention program for the purpose of reducing risks, accidents and losses;

Administer, supervise and manage the investigation and adjustment and settlement of claims covered by this act, including subrogation and restitution claims filed on behalf of the state self-insurance account;

Provide legal services for the defense of claims covered by this act through the attorney general or through private attorneys approved by the attorney general;

Approve and supervise persons who may contract with the state to provide services;

Procure insurance, including comprehensive professional liability coverage for all peace officers, consistent with market availability;

Prepare a budget based upon economically and actuarially sound principles, which will maintain a reasonable and adequate surplus to meet estimated payments for contracts, services, claims and expenses;

Purchase loss prevention, actuarial and other professional services as required; and

Adopt rules governing the administration of the state’s self-insurance account and loss prevention program and to carry out the purposes of this act.

If the risk manager determines it is economically feasible he may contract with any private firm or firms to provide any administrative or other services deemed necessary under this act.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1; 1999, ch. 100, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-41-102(a)(x).

Applied

in

State Ex Rel. Arnold v. Ommen, 2009 WY 24, 201 P.3d 1127,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Feb. 24, 2009).

Quoted

in

W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 1-41-106.
Compromise or settlement of claims; authority; primary insurance
coverage.

Any claim covered under this act may be compromised or settled according to the requirements in subsection (b) of this section. In settling a claim, the risk manager may require the execution and presentation of those documents required by rule and regulation including those documents which discharge or hold harmless the state, local government or public employee of all liability under the claim.

The following parties are authorized to make compromises or settlements of claims in the following amounts:

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 100, § 2.

The risk manager is authorized to settle claims for an amount not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00);

The risk manager, after consultation with the attorney general, is authorized to settle claims for an amount not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00); and

The governor is authorized to settle claims for any amount if the action arises under federal law. The governor is authorized to settle claims brought under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act for any amount not to exceed the maximum liability limits under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act.

The provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act are not applicable to the payment or settlement of claims. Any person or party adversely affected in compromising or settling a claim shall pursue his remedy in district court pursuant to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

The risk manager and the state have no liability, and no cause of action exists against either the risk manager or the state, for failure to settle a claim.

Except with respect to volunteer physicians providing medical services under W.S. 9-2-103(a)(i)(C), an expenditure may be made out of the state self-insurance account for settlement or payment of any claim which is covered by liability insurance only to the extent any other liability insurance is not sufficient to satisfy the claim. Except with respect to volunteer physicians providing medical services under W.S. 9-2-103(a)(i)(C), any other liability insurance shall be considered as the primary coverage. Nothing in this section shall be deemed an increase in the limits of liability under W.S.

1-39-110

or 1-39-118(a).

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1; 1989, ch. 211, § 1; 1994, ch. 63, § 1; 1997, ch. 159, § 1; 1999, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (e) substituted “9-2-103(a)(i))(C)” for “9-2-103(a)(iii)” twice.

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-41-102(a)(x).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. —

See §§

1-39-101

, 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Writ of mandamus. —

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in declining to issue a writ of mandamus where the notice of the employee's claim sought payments denied under the State Employees'
and Officials'
Group Plan (Group Plan), the risk manager's duty was not clear and certain, and had the risk manager investigated the claim as required she likely would have denied it on the ground that the employee had not exhausted the Group Plan appeals process.
State ex rel. Arnold v. Ommen, 2009 WY 24, 201 P.3d 1127,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2009).

§ 1-41-107.
Reports.

The division shall make an annual report to the governor and the legislature. The report shall include:

The total number of claims filed against the state and peace officers covered under this act;

The number and amount of claims settled;

The cost of legal fees and adjustors’ fees for the handling of claims;

The number and amount of final judgments paid;

The number of claims pending and the reserves set aside for each pending claim;

The types and cost of insurance coverages procured as authorized under this act.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-41-102(a)(x).

§ 1-41-108.
Self-insurance program not subject to insurance laws.

Nothing in this act shall
be construed as creating an insurance company nor in any way subjecting
the self-insurance account to the laws of the state regulating insurance
or insurance companies.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-41-102(a)(x).

§ 1-41-109.
Confidential information.

The claim files maintained
by the risk manager shall be considered privileged and confidential
and shall be for the use of the risk manager and the insurance commissioner
only.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to insurance commissioner, see §

26-2-102

.

Redaction of confidential information. —

Prison officials, in complying with an order to produce information concerning their remedial plan to address shortcomings in the prison's internal investigation process, could not redact from investigative reports the non-confidential information concerning the conditions of confinement but were allowed to redact and not publish to the public or inmates confidential materials relating to medical, personnel, and criminal history records, and information which, under a reasonable person standard, was necessary to protect the safety of inmates cooperating in the investigation process. Skinner v. Uphoff, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 31945 (D. Wyo. Sept. 27, 2005), aff'd, 175 Fed. Appx. 255, 2006 U.S. App. LEXIS 9237 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2006).

§ 1-41-110.
Applicability.

This act applies to claims based upon acts, errors or omissions occurring on and after October 1, 1985.

This act applies to claims against peace officers employed by the University of Wyoming but does not apply to other claims against the University of Wyoming unless the university notifies the risk manager in writing on or before August 15 that it elects to be covered by this act for the period beginning July 1 of the succeeding fiscal year. If the University of Wyoming elects to be covered by this act, it shall continue the coverage for not less than three (3) years from the date the coverage begins.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1; 1988, ch. 19, § 2; 1990, ch. 4, § 1; 1999, ch. 100, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 1-41-102(a)(x).

§ 1-41-111.
No extension of liability.

Self-insurance provided
under this act shall not be considered a purchase of insurance coverage
and shall not be deemed an increase of the limits of liability under W.S. 1-39-118(b).

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 74, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-41-102(a)(x).